Utah statutes.
78B-15-501.   Scope of part.

This part governs genetic testing of an individual to determine parentage, whether the individual:

(1)  voluntarily submits to testing; or

(2)  is tested pursuant to an order of a tribunal or a support-enforcement agency.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

